Missouri, session 2026, HB1653.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
D
Section A. Sections 196.010, 196.015, 196.025, 196.045, 196.050, and 196.075,
RSMo, are repealed and six new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
H
196.010, 196.015, 196.025, 196.045, 196.050, and 196.075, to read as follows:
196.010. 1. For the purpose of sections 196.010 to 196.120:
(1) TheT term "cell-cultured meat product" means any food product produced by
cultivating animal cells in a controlled environment, including through the use of a
growth mIedium or bioreactor, to replicate animal tissue intended for human
consumption without requiring the slaughter of the animal;
W
(2) The term "contaminated with filth" applies to any food, drug, device, or cosmetic
not securely protected from dust, dirt, and as far as may be necessary by all reasonable means,
from all foreign or injurious contaminations;
[(2)] (3) The term "cosmetic" means articles intended to be rubbed, poured, sprinkled,
or sprayed on, introduced into, or otherwise applied to the human body or any part thereof for
cleansing, beautifying, promoting attractiveness, or altering the appearance, and articles
intended for use as a component of any such articles, except that such term shall not include
soap;
[(3)] (4) The term "device" except when used in subsection 2 of this section and in
sections 196.015(10), 196.075(6), 196.100(3) and 196.115(3), means instruments, apparatus,
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1653 2
and contrivances, including their components, parts, and accessories, intended for use in the
diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in man or other animals; or to
affect the structure or any function of the body of man or other animals;
[(4)] (5) The term "department" shall be construed to mean the department of health
and senior services;
N
[(5)] (6) The term "drug" means (a) articles recognized in the official United States
Pharmacopoeia, official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, or official
National Formulary, or any supplement to any of them; andW (b) articles intended for use in the
diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in man or other animals; and
(c) articles, other than food, intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of man
or other animals; and (d) articles intended for use as a component of any articles specified in
A
clause (a), (b), or (c); but does not include devices or their components, parts or accessories;
[(6)] (7) The term "federal act" means the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act
(Title 21 U.S.C. 301 et seq.; 52 Stat. 10R40 et seq.);
[(7)] (8) The term "food" means articles used for food or drink for man or other
animals, chewing gum, and articles used for components of any such article;
D
[(8)] (9) The term "immediate container" does not include package liners;
[(9)] (10) The term "label" means a display of written, printed, or graphic matter upon
the immediate containHer of any article; and a requirement made by or under authority of
sections 196.010 to 196.120 that any word, statement, or other information appearing on the
label shall not be considered to be complied with unless such word, statement, or other
T
information also appears on the outside container or wrapper, if any there be, of the retail
package of such article, or is easily legible through the outside container or wrapper;
[(10I)] (11) The term "labeling" means all labels and other written, printed, or graphic
Wmatter upon any article or any of its containers or wrappers, or accompanying such article;
[(11)] (12) The term "livestock" means cattle, swine, sheep, goats, poultry, fish,
and other species raised for human consumption;
(13) The term "meat" means the edible portion of livestock derived from the
slaughter of a living animal. The term "meat" shall not include any cell-cultured meat
product;
(14) The term "mRNA-based product" means any vaccine, treatment, or
substance that employs messenger ribonucleic acid (mRNA) technology or another
gene-therapy mechanism to alter or introduce genetic material within an animal or
plant used for human food;
(15) The term "new drug" means any drug the composition of which is such that such
drug is not generally recognized, among experts qualified by scientific training and
experience to evaluate the safety of drugs, as safe for use under the conditions prescribed,

HB 1653 3
recommended or suggested in the labeling thereof; or any drug the composition of which is
such that such drug, as a result of investigations to determine its safety for use under such
conditions, has become so recognized, but which has not, otherwise than in such
investigations, been used to a material extent or for a material time under such conditions;
[(12)] (16) The term "official compendium" means the official United States
N
Pharmacopoeia, official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, official National
Formulary, or any supplement to any of them;
[(13)] (17) The term "person" includes individuWal, partnership, corporation, and
association.
2. If an article is alleged to be misbranded because the labeling is misleading, then in
determining whether the labeling is misleading, there shall be taken into account, among
A
other things, not only representations made or suggested by statement, word, design, device,
sound, or in any combination thereof, but also the extent to which the labeling fails to reveal
facts material in the light of such represRentations or material with respect to consequences
which may result from the use of the article to which the labeling relates under the conditions
of use prescribed in the labeling thereof or under such conditions of use as are customary or
D
usual.
3. The representation of a drug, in its labeling, as an antiseptic shall be considered to
be a representation thaHt it is a germicide, except in the case of a drug purporting to be, or
represented as, an antiseptic for inhibitory use as a wet dressing, ointment, dusting powder, or
such other use as involves prolonged contact with the body.
T
4. The provisions of sections 196.010 to 196.120 regarding the selling of food, drugs,
devices, or cosmetics, shall be considered to include the manufacture, production, processing,
packing, eIxposure, offer, possession, and holding of any such article for sale and the sale,
Wdispensing, and giving of any such article, and the supplying of any such articles in the
conduct of any food, drug, or cosmetic establishment.
196.015. The following acts and the causing thereof within the state of Missouri are
hereby prohibited:
(1) The manufacture, sale, or delivery, holding or offering for sale of any food, drug,
device, or cosmetic that is adulterated or misbranded;
(2) The adulteration or misbranding of any food, drug, device, or cosmetic;
(3) The receipt in commerce of any food, drug, device, or cosmetic that is adulterated
or misbranded, and the delivery or proffered delivery thereof for pay or otherwise;
(4) The sale, delivery for sale, holding for sale, or offering for sale of any article in
violation of section 196.080 or 196.105;
(5) The dissemination of any false advertisement;

HB 1653 4
(6) The refusal to permit entry or inspection, or to permit the taking of a sample, as
authorized by section 196.055;
(7) The giving of a guaranty or undertaking referred to in section 196.025(2), which
guaranty or undertaking is false; except by a person who relied on a guaranty or undertaking
to the same effect signed by, and containing the name and address of the person residing in
N
the state of Missouri or in the United States, from whom he or she received in good faith the
food, drug, device, or cosmetic;
(8) The removal or disposal of a detained or embarWgoed article in violation of section
196.030;
(9) The alteration, mutilation, destruction, obliteration, or removal of the whole or
any part of the labeling of, or the doing of any other act with respect to a food, drug, device,
A
or cosmetic, if such act is done while such article is held for sale and results in such article
being misbranded;
(10) Forging, counterfeiting, simRulating, or falsely representing, or without proper
authority using any mark, stamp, tag, label, or other identification device authorized or
required by regulations promulgated under the provisions of sections 196.010 to 196.120;
D
(11) The using, on the labeling of any drug or in any advertising relating to such drug,
of any representation or suggestion that an application with respect to such drug is effective
under section 196.105,H or that such drug complies with the provisions of such section;
(12) The using by any person to his or her own advantage, or revealing, other than to
the department, or to the courts when relevant in any judicial proceeding under sections
T
196.010 to 196.120, any information acquired under authority of [sections] section 196.055,
196.080, or 196.105 concerning any method or process which as a trade secret is entitled to
protection;I and
W(13) The manufacturing, processing, possessing for sale, distributing, offering
for sale, or selling of any cell-cultured meat product for human consumption. The
prohibition in this subdivision applies regardless of whether the cell-cultured meat
product is labeled or marketed as meat, poultry, fish, or any other animal-protein
analogue. The prohibition in this subdivision shall not apply to bona fide scientific
research conducted in an accredited academic or government laboratory where the cell-
cultured meat product is not sold or offered for human consumption.
196.025. 1. Any person who violates any of the provisions of section 196.015 shall,
on conviction, be adjudged guilty of a misdemeanor, and punished by a fine of not more than
one thousand dollars, or imprisonment for not more than one year or by both such fine and
imprisonment.
2. No person shall be subject to the penalties of subsection 1 of this section for having
violated section 196.015(1) or 196.015(3), if he or she establishes a guaranty or undertaking

HB 1653 5
signed by the person from whom he or shepurchased the food, drug, device, or cosmetic; if a
resident of this state, that the food, drug, device, or cosmetic is not adulterated or misbranded
within the meaning of sections 196.010 to 196.120, designating it, or, if a nonresident of this
state residing in the United States, or a resident of this state engaged in interstate commerce
with reference to the product involved, that the food, drug, device, or cosmetic is not
N
adulterated or misbranded within the meaning of an act of congress entitled "An act to
prohibit the movement in interstate commerce of adulterated and misbranded food, drugs,
devices, and cosmetics, and for other purposes" approved JWune 25, 1938, and the supplements
and amendments thereto.
3. In addition to the penalties of subsection 1 of this section, the department of
health and senior services may impose an administrative penalty of up to ten thousand
A
dollars for each violation of:
(1) Subdivision (1) of section 196.015 if the violation relates to misbranding
under subdivision (12) of section 196.0R75; or
(2) Subdivision (13) of section 196.015.
4. No publisher, radio broadcast licensee, or agency or medium for the dissemination
D
of an advertisement, except the manufacturer, packer, distributor, or seller of the article to
which a false advertisement relates shall be liable under this section by reason of the
dissemination by him oHf such false advertisement, unless he has refused, on the request of the
department of health and senior services to furnish the said department the name and post-
office address of the manufacturer, packer, distributor, seller, or advertising agency, residing
T
in the state of Missouri, or in the United States, who caused him to disseminate such
advertisement.
196I.045. 1. The authority to promulgate regulations for the efficient enforcement of
Wsections 196.010 to 196.120 is hereby vested in the department of health and senior services
and, for the purposes described in subsection 3 of this section, in the department of
agriculture. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the department shall make the
regulations promulgated under said sections conform, insofar as practicable, with those
promulgated under the federal act.
2. Hearings authorized or required by sections 196.010 to 196.120 shall be conducted
by the department of health and senior services or such officer, agent, or employee as the
department may designate for the purpose.
3. The department of agriculture and the department of health and senior
services shall jointly promulgate rules to implement subdivision (13) of section 196.015
and subdivision (12) of section 196.075. The rules promulgated in accordance with this
subsection may impose requirements that are not imposed under federal law, and
compliance with subdivision (13) of section 196.015 and subdivision (12) of section

HB 1653 6
196.075 and the corresponding rules shall be required regardless of whether the federal
act or the rules promulgated under the federal act impose such requirements. The rules
promulgated under this subsection shall include, but not be limited to, rules to:
(1) Establish verification and inspection procedures for identifying mRNA-based
exposure in livestock or crops;
N
(2) Define uniform labeling and disclosure standards consistent with state and
federal law; and
(3) Coordinate enforcement with the United StWates Department of Agriculture
and the Food and Drug Administration regarding interstate food safety to the extent
practicable.
4. Regulations shall be promulgated pursuant to the requirements of this section and
A
chapter 536. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated under the authority of this chapter shall
become effective unless it has been promulgated pursuant to the provisions of section
536.024. R
196.050. Except as otherwise provided in section 196.045,in no event shall the said
department of health and senior services prescribe or promulgate any regulation fixing or
D
establishing any definitions or standards which are more rigid or more stringent than those
prescribed by the federal act applying to any commodity covered by sections 196.010 to
196.120 and if any prHoduct or commodity covered by said sections shall comply with the
definitions and standards prescribed by the federal act for such product or commodity, such
product or commodity shall be deemed in all respects to comply with sections 196.010 to
T
196.120.
196.075. A food shall be deemed to be misbranded:
(1) IIf its labeling is false or misleading in any particular;
W(2) If it is offered for sale under the name of another food;
(3) If it is an imitation of another food, unless its label bears, in type of uniform size
and prominence, the word, "imitation", and, immediately thereafter, the name of the food
imitated;
(4) If its container is so made, formed or filled as to be misleading;
(5) If in package form, unless it bears a label containing:
(a) The name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer or distributor;
(b) An accurate statement of the quantity of the contents in terms of weight, measure,
or numerical count; provided, that under clause (b) of this subdivision reasonable variations
shall be permitted, and exemptions as to small packages shall be established, by regulations
prescribed by the department of health and senior services;
(6) If any word, statement, or other information required by or under authority of
sections 196.010 to 196.120 to appear on the label or labeling is not prominently placed

HB 1653 7
thereon with such conspicuousness, as compared with other words, statements, designs, or
devices, in the labeling, and in such terms as to render it likely to be read and understood by
the ordinary individual under customary conditions of purchase and use;
(7) If it purports to be or is represented as a food for which a definition and standard
of identity has been prescribed by regulations as provided by section 196.050, unless it
N
conforms to such definition and standard, and its label bears the name of the food specified in
the definition and standard, and, insofar as may be required by such regulations, the common
names of optional ingredients, other than spices, flavoring, Wand coloring, present in such food;
(8) If it purports to be or is represented as:
(a) A food for which a standard of quality has been prescribed by regulations as
provided by section 196.050 and its quality falls below such standard unless its label bears, in
A
such manner and form as such regulations specify, a statement that it falls below such
standard;
(b) A food for which a standard oRr standards of fill of container have been prescribed
by regulation as provided by section 196.050, and it falls below the standard of fill of
container applicable thereto, unless its label bears, in such manner and form as such
D
regulations specify, a statement that it falls below such standard;
(9) If it is not subject to the provisions of subdivision (7) of this section, unless it
bears labeling clearly Hgiving:
(a) The common or usual name of the food, if any there be; and
(b) In case it is fabricated from two or more ingredients, the common or usual name
T
of each such ingredient, except that spices, flavorings, and colorings, other than those sold as
such, may be designated as spices, flavorings, and colorings, without naming each; provided,
that, to theI extent that compliance with the requirements of paragraph (b) of this subdivision
Wis impractical or results in deception or unfair competition, exemptions shall be established by
regulations promulgated by the department of health and senior services; provided further,
that the requirements of paragraph (b) of this subdivision shall not apply to any carbonated
beverage the ingredients of which have been fully and correctly disclosed, to the extent
prescribed by said paragraph (b) to the department of health and senior services in an
affidavit;
(10) If it purports to be or is represented for special dietary uses, unless its label bears
such information concerning its vitamin, mineral, and other dietary properties as the
department of health and senior services determines to be, and by regulations prescribed, as
necessary in order to fully inform purchasers as to its value for such uses;
(11) If it bears or contains any artificial flavoring, coloring, or chemical preservative,
unless it bears labeling stating that fact; provided, that to the extent that compliance with the
requirements of this subdivision is impracticable, exemptions shall be established by

HB 1653 8
regulations promulgated by the department of health and senior services; and provided
further, that subdivision (11) shall not apply to artificial coloring in butter, cheese or ice
cream;
(12) If it is a meat, poultry, fish, or agricultural product derived from an animal
or plant that has been treated with, injected with, or otherwise exposed to any mRNA-
N
based product or gene-therapy substance and purports to be or is represented for
human consumption unless the use of the mRNA-based product or gene-therapy
substance is clearly disclosed on the product label in pWrint not smaller than the print
used for the ingredients list. Any conventional, non-gene-altering vaccine or biologic
traditionally used for animal health and approved under state or federal law shall be
exempt from this subdivision;
A
(13) The department is hereby directed to promulgate regulations exempting from
any labeling requirement of sections 196.010 to 196.120 small open containers of fresh fruits
and vegetables and food which is, in Raccordance with the practice of the trade, to be
processed, labeled, or repacked in substantial quantities at establishments other than those
where originally processed or packed, on condition that such food is not adulterated or
D
misbranded under the provisions of said sections upon removal from such processing,
labeling or repackaging establishment.
Section B. BeHcause immediate action is necessary to protect Missouri's livestock
industry and food supply integrity and ensure consumer transparency, section A of this act is
deemed necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health, welfare, peace, and
T
safety, and is hereby declared to be an emergency act within the meaning of the constitution,
and section A of this act shall be in full force and effect upon its passage and approval.
I
✔
W